Utah statutes.
41-1a-509.   Manufacturer's certificate of origin or title.

(1)  If a vehicle other than an off-highway vehicle older than a 1988 model year, or a vessel or outboard motor older than a 1985 model year has not been previously titled, the application for certificate of title shall include the manufacturer's certificate of origin properly endorsed for transfer.

(2)  The manufacturer's certificate of origin shall show:

(a)  the date of sale to the dealer or person first receiving it from the manufacturer;

(b)  the name of the dealer or person;

(c)  a description sufficient to identify the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor; and

(d)  a certification by the dealer that the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor was new when sold to the applicant.

(3) (a)  If the vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor is from a state or foreign country that does not issue or require certificates of title, the owner shall submit a bill of sale, sworn statement of ownership, or any other evidence of ownership required by the division.

(b)  The division may refuse to issue a certificate of title or an affidavit of Mobile Home Affixture if the applicant fails to submit the evidence of ownership required.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 218, 1992 General Session

